Utah statutes.
62A-2-112.   Violations -- Penalties.
If the office finds that a violation has occurred under Section 62A-2-111, it
may:
(1)  deny, place conditions on, suspend, or revoke a license, if it finds:
(a)  that there has been a failure to comply with the rules established under
this chapter; or
(b)  evidence of aiding, abetting, or permitting the commission of any illegal
act; or
(2)  restrict or prohibit new admissions to a human services program or
facility, if it finds:
(a)  that there has been a failure to comply with rules established under this
chapter; or
(b)  evidence of aiding, abetting, or permitting the commission of any illegal
act in the  human services program or facility.
